Oklahoma, session 2026, SB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 12-417, as


amended by Section 97, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 12-417), is amended to read as follows:


Section 12-417. A. 1. Every Any operator and front seat


passenger of a Class A commercial motor vehicle, Class B commercial


motor vehicle, Class C commercial motor vehicle, or a passenger


vehicle operated in this state shall wear a properly adjusted and


fastened safety seat belt system, required to be installed in the


motor vehicle when manufactured pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Section


571.208.


2. Any passenger in the back seat of a passenger vehicle who is


sixteen (16) years of age or younger shall wear a properly adjusted

Req. No. 874 Page 1


and fastened safety seat belt system, unless otherwise in a child


passenger restraint system as required pursuant to Section 11-1112


of this title.


3. For the purposes of this section, “passenger vehicle” shall


mean a Class D motor vehicle, but shall not include trucks, truck-


tractors, recreational vehicles, motorcycles, or motorized bicycles,


or a vehicle used primarily for farm use which is registered and


licensed pursuant to the provisions of Section 1134 of this title.


B. The Commissioner of Public Safety, upon application from a


person who, for medical reasons, is unable to wear a safety seat


belt system supported by written attestation of such fact from a


physician licensed pursuant to Section 495 of Title 59 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, may issue to the person an exemption from the


provisions of this section. The exemption shall be in the form of a


restriction appearing on the driver license of the person and shall


remain in effect until the expiration date of the driver license.


Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the person


from applying for another exemption as provided for in this section.


The issuance of an attestation by a physician and the subsequent


issuance of an exemption by the Commissioner, in good faith, shall


not give rise to, nor shall the physician and the state thereby


incur, any liability whatsoever in damages or otherwise, to any


person injured by reason of failure of the person to wear a safety


seat belt system.

Req. No. 874 Page 2


C. This section shall not apply to an operator of a motor


vehicle while performing official duties as a route carrier of the


U.S. Postal Service.


D. The Department of Public Safety shall not record or assess


points for violations of this section on any license holder’s


traffic record maintained by Service Oklahoma.


E. Fine and court costs for violating the provisions of this


section shall not exceed Twenty Dollars ($20.00).


F. Municipalities may enact and municipal police officers may


enforce ordinances prohibiting and penalizing conduct under


provisions of this section, but the provisions of those ordinances


shall be the same as provided for in this section, and the


enforcement provisions under those ordinances shall not be more


stringent than those of this section.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-874 CN 12/26/2024 12:44:29 PM









Req. No. 874 Page 3